Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE G. NON-BACCALAUREATE SYSTEM

CHAPTER 134. JOBS AND EDUCATION FOR TEXANS (JET) GRANT PROGRAM

Sec. 134.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Workforce Commission.

(2) "Public junior college," "public technical institute," and "public state college" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 64, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 437), Sec. 3(a), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1351), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2431), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2017.

Sec. 134.002. JOBS AND EDUCATION FOR TEXANS (JET) FUND. (a) The commission shall establish and administer the Jobs and Education for Texans (JET) fund as a dedicated account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The following amounts shall be deposited in the fund:

(1) any amounts appropriated by the legislature for the fund for purposes of this chapter;

(2) interest earned on the investment of money in the fund; and

(3) gifts, grants, and other donations received for the fund.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 64, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1351), Sec. 2, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 134.003. ADVISORY BOARD. (a) An advisory board of education and workforce stakeholders is created to assist the commission in administering this chapter.

(b) The advisory board is composed of six members who serve two-year terms and are appointed as follows:

(1) one member appointed by the governor;

(2) one member appointed by the lieutenant governor;

(3) one member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(4) one member appointed by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board;

(5) one member appointed by the commission; and

(6) the chair of the commission, who serves as the presiding officer.

(c) The advisory board shall meet at least once each quarter, or as needed, to review received applications and recommend awarding grants under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 64, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 3, eff. June 10, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1351), Sec. 3, eff. June 16, 2015.

Sec. 134.004. JOBS AND EDUCATION FOR TEXANS (JET) GRANT PROGRAM. (a) The commission shall establish and administer the Jobs and Education for Texans (JET) Grant Program to provide grants to public junior colleges, public technical institutes, public state colleges, and school districts and open-enrollment charter schools described under Section 134.007 that apply to the advisory board in the manner prescribed by the advisory board. The commission shall award the grants on the advice and recommendations of the advisory board.

(b) Grants may be awarded under this chapter from the Jobs and Education for Texans (JET) fund to defray the start-up costs associated with the development of new career and technical education programs at public junior colleges, public technical institutes, public state colleges, and school districts and open-enrollment charter schools described under Section 134.007 that meet the requirements of Section 134.006.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 64, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 859 (H.B. 437), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 4, eff. June 10, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1351), Sec. 4, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2431), Sec. 2, eff. June 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 80 (S.B. 346), Sec. 1, eff. May 24, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 499 (H.B. 4279), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Reenacted by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 6.012, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 134.006. GRANTS TO EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS. (a) The commission may award a grant for the development of new career and technical education courses or programs at public junior colleges, public technical institutes, public state colleges, and school districts and open-enrollment charter schools described under Section 134.007.

(b) A grant received under this section may be used only:

(1) to support courses or programs that prepare students for career employment in occupations that are identified by local businesses as being in high demand, including courses offered for dual credit;

(2) to finance initial costs of career and technical education course or program development, including the costs of constructing or renovating facilities, purchasing equipment, and other expenses associated with the development of a new course; and

(3) to finance a career and technical education course or program that leads to a license, certificate, or postsecondary degree.

(c) In awarding a grant under this section, the commission shall primarily consider the potential economic returns to the state from the development of the career and technical education course or program. The commission may also consider whether the course or program:

(1) is part of a new, emerging industry or high-demand occupation;

(2) offers new or expanded dual credit career and technical educational opportunities in public high schools;

(3) offers new career and technical educational opportunities not previously available to students enrolled at any campus in the Windham School District; or

(4) is provided in cooperation with other public junior colleges, public technical institutes, or public state colleges across existing service areas.

(d) To be eligible to receive a grant under this section, a public junior college, public technical institute, public state college, or school district or open-enrollment charter school described under Section 134.007 must provide matching funds in accordance with rules adopted under Section 134.008. The matching funds may be obtained from any source available to the public junior college, public technical institute, public state college, school district, or open-enrollment charter school, including industry consortia, community or foundation grants, individual contributions, and local governmental agency operating funds.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 64, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 5, eff. June 10, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1351), Sec. 5, eff. June 16, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2431), Sec. 3, eff. June 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 80 (S.B. 346), Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 499 (H.B. 4279), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 6.013, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 6.014, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 134.007. GRANTS AWARDED TO SCHOOL DISTRICT OR OPEN-ENROLLMENT CHARTER SCHOOL. The commission may award a grant under this chapter to:

(1) an independent school district or open-enrollment charter school if the district or school has entered into a partnership with a public junior college, public technical institute, or public state college for the purpose of:

(A) promoting career and technical education to the district's or school's students; or

(B) offering dual credit courses to the district's or school's students; or

(2) the Windham School District.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 6, eff. June 10, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 359 (H.B. 2431), Sec. 4, eff. June 1, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 80 (S.B. 346), Sec. 3, eff. May 24, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 499 (H.B. 4279), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 768 (H.B. 4595), Sec. 6.015, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 134.008. RULES. The commission shall adopt rules as necessary for the administration of this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 64, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 416 (H.B. 3062), Sec. 7, eff. June 10, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 630 (S.B. 1351), Sec. 6, eff. June 16, 2015.